Utah statutes.
53A-3-402.7.   Kindergartens -- Establishment -- Funding.

(1)  Kindergartens are an integral part of the state's public education system.

(2)  By July 1, 1994, each local board of education shall provide kindergarten classes free of charge for kindergarten children residing within the district.

(3)  Kindergartens established under Subsection (2) shall receive state money under Title 53A, Chapter 17a, The Minimum School Program Act.



Enacted by Chapter 122, 1993 General Session

